Tennessee statutes. Title 57 Intoxicating Liquors
Part 3

Taxes

57-3-301. Brand name alcoholic beverages — Tax — Sale or importation — Contracts — Revocation of permits or licenses.

As used in this section “brand” means:

Each and every distilled spirits, wine product, beer with an alcoholic content of five percent (5%) by weight or greater high alcohol content beer product bearing a distinct brand name or trade name as defined or used by the United States department of the treasury, alcohol and tobacco tax and trade bureau, shall be considered a separate “brand” for purposes of this section;

Within the group of wine or distilled spirits products bottled, manufactured, distilled, rectified, imported or marketed under a particular “brand name” or “trade name” as described in subdivision (a)(1), products which fall within separate classes or types as defined in the standards of identity for the several classes and types of wine and distilled spirits promulgated by the federal bureau of alcohol, tobacco and firearms shall be considered separate “brands” for purposes of this section; provided, that wine or distilled spirits products which differ only in the amount of alcohol or proof they contain shall not be considered separate brands for purposes of this section;

The name, trademark, or trade name of the product, as indicated on the certificate of label approval as registered with the alcohol and tobacco tax and trade bureau of the United States department of the treasury, or, if no certificate of label approval is required, then the name, trademark, or trade name of the product.

There is imposed a tax of two hundred fifty dollars ($250) per annum upon each brand of distilled spirits sold in this state, for which actual wholesale sales during the twelve (12) months immediately preceding May 22, 1979, were fifty (50) cases or more.

There is imposed a tax of one hundred dollars ($100) per annum upon each brand of distilled spirits sold in this state for which actual wholesale sales during the twelve (12) months immediately preceding May 22, 1979, were less than fifty (50) cases.

There is imposed an annual tax upon each brand of wine sold in this state. The amount of this tax shall be based on the number of cases sold at wholesale in this state during the year immediately preceding any tax year as follows:

Less than two hundred fifty (250) cases — No tax due; and

Two hundred fifty (250) or more cases — Two hundred fifty dollars ($250).

There is imposed a tax of one hundred dollars ($100) per annum upon each brand of beer with an alcoholic content greater than five percent (5%) by weight or each brand of high alcohol content beer sold in this state.

No manufacturer, importer or representative shall introduce into this state any brand of alcoholic beverages until such tax has been paid to the department of revenue.

No wholesaler shall give an order, receive, accept or offer for sale any brand of alcohol beverages until the annual tax has been paid to the department of revenue.

No brand may be introduced into the state except pursuant to written contract to sell such brand in this state between the manufacturer, brewer or importer of such brand and the Tennessee wholesaler who is to sell such brand in this state. Every contract shall contain the specified area in which such wholesaler will sell such brand and no more than one wholesaler may sell such brand in any specified area.

If any party to a contract described in subdivision (e)(1) fails to comply with any provision of the contract, an aggrieved party may bring an action in the circuit or chancery courts of this state.

No contract shall include the entire state of Tennessee as the specified area in which such wholesaler will sell any brand.

No manufacturer or importer nor any successor to a manufacturer or importer may terminate a contract prior to the expiration of its term except for good cause, asserted in good faith, as determined by the commissioner of revenue. No manufacturer or importer, nor any successor to a manufacturer or importer may seek to terminate a contract for good cause, unless such manufacturer or importer has afforded the affected wholesaler with whom it has contracted a reasonable opportunity to cure any deficiency which in no event shall be less than thirty (30) days. No successor to a manufacturer or importer may register a contract to distribute a brand in this state with the department of revenue which differs from the contract previously filed for the distribution of such brand except for good cause, asserted in good faith, as determined by the commissioner of revenue.

No manufacturer or importer nor any successor to a manufacturer or importer may fail to renew a contract with a wholesaler except for good cause, asserted in good faith, as determined by the commissioner of revenue. No manufacturer or importer, nor any successor to a manufacturer or importer may fail to renew a contract for good cause, unless such manufacturer or importer has afforded the affected wholesaler a reasonable opportunity to cure any deficiency which in no event shall be less than thirty (30) days.

For purposes of this section, any modification of the designated area serviced by a wholesaler shall constitute a termination of its contract.

If the commissioner of revenue, after a hearing, determines the manufacturer or importer has failed to establish good cause asserted in good faith as required herein, the provisions of the contract between such manufacturer or importer and the designated Tennessee wholesaler are still in force and a failure by such manufacturer or importer or its successor to ship to such a wholesaler a reasonable amount of the brand shall be grounds for a revocation of that manufacturer's or importer's nonresident seller's permit or winery license.

The department of revenue is authorized to accept the brand registrations required under this section and the contracts described in subdivision (e)(1) by electronic means. The department of revenue is authorized to approve one (1) or more third parties to facilitate electronic submissions on behalf of importers, manufacturers, suppliers, or wholesalers; provided, that such third parties shall:

Be permitted to assess a reasonable cost against the importer, supplier, manufacturer, or wholesaler that elects to use the electronic service;

Not assess any fees or costs against the state for providing such service;

Adhere to the records requirements, privacy requirements, and technical requirements imposed by the department of revenue;

Agree to provide documentation and support for all brand registrations and contract registrations as required by the department of revenue as part of the electronic process; and

Agree to facilitate communication between the department of revenue and the affected importers, manufacturers, suppliers, and wholesalers to relate the status of any filing, transfer, or tax liability.

The department of revenue is authorized to promulgate rules and regulations relative to the brand registration provisions of this section.

Acts 1979, ch. 341, § 1; T.C.A., § 57-130; Acts 1980, ch. 782, § 1; 1984, ch. 684, §§ 1, 2; 1985, ch. 125, § 1; 1996, ch. 706, §§ 1, 2; 2013, ch. 171, §§ 1, 2; 2014, ch. 861, §§ 20-22.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 1985, ch. 125, § 2 provided that it is the intent of the general assembly to afford all affected parties to a proposed change in distribution of a brand of alcoholic beverage the right to a hearing prior to the change becoming effective.

For regulations regarding wine and distilled spirits promulgated by the federal bureau of alcohol, tobacco, and firearms, referred to in this section, see 27 CFR 4.1 et seq. and 27 CFR 5.1 et seq.

Cross-References. Damaged or unaccepted goods, tax liability, §57-3-109.

Attorney General Opinions. Brand transfer hearings in the department of revenue, OAG 90-65 (6/12/90).

A vendor who is caught selling beer to a minor is subject to criminal penalties imposed by the local criminal court ranging from a Class A misdemeanor to a Class E felony and is also subject to the suspension or revocation of his permit imposed by the local beer board, OAG 01-062 (4/20/01).

57-3-302. Tax upon distribution or sale — Exemptions.

There is levied upon the sale or distribution by sale or gift a tax of one dollar and twenty-one cents ($1.21) on each gallon of wine, and a like or proportional rate per gallon on wine sold or distributed in any other container of more or less than one gallon (1 gal.); provided, however, that this chapter shall not apply to the sale, gift or distribution of any wine manufactured, sold, given away or distributed and used solely for sacramental purposes.

There is levied upon the sale or distribution by sale or gift a tax of four dollars and forty cents ($4.40) on each gallon of spirits, and a like or proportional rate per gallon on spirits sold or distributed in any container of more or less than one gallon (1 gal.).

Acts 1939, ch. 49, § 13; 1943, ch. 5, § 1; 1947, ch. 61, § 1; C. Supp. 1950, § 6648.19 (Williams, § 6648.16); Acts 1963, ch. 37, § 1; 1967, ch. 331, § 2; 1977, ch. 126, § 3; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 57-131; Acts 1985, ch. 386, § 2; 2002, ch. 856, §§ 1a, 1c.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2002, ch. 856, § 10, effective July 4, 2002, which raised the amount of tax to be levied in subsections (a) and (b), provided that notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, the commissioner of revenue is authorized to waive tax liability and associated interest and penalties otherwise imposed for failure to pay taxes levied pursuant to that act in a timely manner, but only to the extent that the taxpayer or vendor can demonstrate, to the commissioner's satisfaction, that the taxpayer's or vendor's noncompliance with the requirements of the act unavoidably and directly resulted from the close proximity of the effective date of the act with implementation of the increase in tax rates or items or activities taxed pursuant to the provisions of the act. Section 14(j) of that same act provided that § 10 be repealed effective September 2, 2002.

Acts 2002, ch. 856, § 13 provided that no expenditure of public funds pursuant to that act shall be made in violation of the provisions of Title VI of the Civil Rights Act of 1964, as codified in 42 U.S.C. § 2000d.

Cross-References. Tennessee wine products exempt from tax, §57-3-207.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 16 Tenn. Juris., Intoxicating Liquors, §§ 13, 14.

Law Reviews.

A Focus on Taxes: The Tennessee Tax Reform Act of 2002 Explained, 38 No. 9 Tenn. B.J. 12 (2002).

57-3-303. Payment of tax — Returns — Bond — Stamps — Rules and regulations — Penalties — Armed forces exemption.

Any wholesaler who imports alcoholic beverages into this state, or who receives alcoholic beverages manufactured in the state, for the purpose of resale in any retail container for eventual retail sale or distribution by sale or gift in this state, shall pay the tax imposed in § 57-3-302; provided, that manufacturers and rectifiers duly qualified under this chapter shall be exempt therefrom on all out of state shipments made to persons holding both federal and state permits to sell alcoholic beverages; and provided further, that any distiller or manufacturer licensed to manufacture alcoholic beverages in Tennessee shall be permitted to pay such tax to the commissioner of revenue on such amount of its own product as may be needed for its own use, not to exceed one hundred (100) cases per month. Whenever “sale” or “sold” is used hereinafter in this section, it also means “use” or “used” and “distribute by gift” or “distributed by gift,” unless the context requires otherwise.

The tax levied by § 57-3-302 shall become due and payable on the first day of each month following the month during which taxable transactions occur, and shall become delinquent if not paid on or before the fifteenth day of each such following month. For the purpose of ascertaining the amount of tax payable, it is the duty of each licensed wholesaler, distiller or manufacturer to transmit to the commissioner a return, as provided for hereinafter, on or before the fifteenth day of each month, upon forms prescribed, and furnished by the commissioner. The tax liability established on the return submitted shall be based upon adjusted gross sales, other than sales or returns to wholesalers and/or suppliers, for the preceding calendar month, and payment thereof shall be made on or before the fifteenth day following such month.

In the event of termination of business by a wholesaler, a final return shall be filed and all tax due paid on or before the fifteenth day following closure.

Each wholesaler of alcoholic beverages in this state shall file, on or before the fifteenth day of each month, an exact and verified return with the commissioner showing therein, for the preceding calendar month, the quantities of alcoholic beverage:

Constituting the wholesaler's beginning and ending inventory;

Shipped to the wholesaler from within this state and received by the wholesaler in this state;

Shipped to the wholesaler from outside the state and received by the wholesaler in this state;

Sold by the wholesaler to purchasers or persons in this state and, indicated separately, those sales or transactions of alcoholic beverages to purchasers or persons within this state on which the tax levied in § 57-3-302 is not applicable; and

Sold by the wholesaler to purchasers or persons outside this state.

Such report shall also contain any other information required by the commissioner.

Each wholesaler, distiller or manufacturer required to file a return shall keep accurate and complete books and records, accounts, and other documents as may be deemed necessary by the commissioner and the commission to substantiate the accuracy of the wholesaler's, distiller's or manufacturer's return and the amount of tax due, and shall retain such records for a period of three (3) years.

The commission, after public hearing of which the licensee shall have due notice as heretofore provided in this chapter, may suspend or revoke any license heretofore issued under this chapter for a failure to pay any tax required by this chapter and may suspend or revoke such license for a violation of or failure to comply with the rules and regulations promulgated hereunder, upon receipt of a certification from the commissioner reflecting such failure to pay such tax or a violation of or failure to comply with such rules and regulations.

In order to ensure the payment of taxes levied herein, every licensed wholesaler of alcoholic beverages shall qualify with the commissioner before making sales of any alcoholic beverages in this state.

In order to so qualify, each wholesaler who is licensed in this state shall annually furnish the department:

A cash bond, or a surety bond, with a solvent surety company qualified to do business in this state, the amount of which shall be no less than one hundred ten percent (110%) of the average monthly tax liability of such licensee for the taxes imposed herein during the preceding twelve-month period;

Any wholesaler shall before beginning business file an initial bond for a period of four (4) months, the amount of which shall be determined by the commissioner, and at the end of such period the bond shall be adjusted for the balance of the twelve-month period or until the following July 1, whichever occurs first, in an amount no less than one hundred ten percent (110%) of the average tax liability of licensee for the first four (4) months engaged in business, and such bond shall be adjusted annually thereafter in the manner as set forth in subdivision (f)(2)(A); and

Such other information as the commissioner may require.

The purchase and affixation of alcoholic beverage tax or identification stamps are not required in this state, and all requirements pertaining to the purchase and affixation of such stamps are hereby specifically repealed.

If a taxpayer has been in continuous operation for three (3) consecutive years and during the preceding twelve (12) months has paid the gallonage tax imposed by § 57-3-302 for which the taxpayer is liable within the period set by this section or by rule, then the taxpayer shall not be required to execute and maintain any bond required by this section.

Any taxpayer exempted from the bonding requirement of this section who fails to pay the tax levied by § 57-3-302 within the period for payment set by this section or by rule shall, upon such failure, be required to execute and maintain a bond as required in this section.

The commission shall be authorized to prescribe the manner by which any licensee shall document that all alcoholic beverages sold or distributed in this state have been properly distributed and that all taxes imposed hereunder have been paid.

The commission and the commissioner are authorized to make reasonable rules and regulations, not inconsistent with this chapter, relative to the proper documentation needed to demonstrate that all alcoholic beverages and wine distributed in this state have been properly taxed.

The state tax set forth in this title on intoxicating liquor or alcoholic beverages, as defined in § 57-3-101, shall not be applicable to such intoxicating liquors or alcoholic beverages sold for consumption within the geographical boundaries of a fort, base, camp or post of the armed forces of the United States, or to post exchanges, ship service stores, commissaries and messes operated by the United States armed forces. The exemption of the tax herein made shall be effectuated by the department allowing wholesalers and distilleries, duly licensed in Tennessee, credit for taxes paid on such intoxicating liquors or alcoholic beverages sold to post exchanges, ship service stores, commissaries and messes operated and controlled by the United States armed forces, and which are instrumentalities of the government of the United States. This credit shall be allowed only upon application made therefor to the department by the wholesaler or distillery delivering the intoxicating liquor or alcoholic beverage, and upon a showing by copy of the invoice with the signature of an officer or civilian employee who possesses managerial authority over the post exchange, ship service store, commissary or mess certifying that the alcoholic beverage was sold to and delivered to the post exchange, ship service store, commissary or mess by the Tennessee wholesaler or distillery. In addition, the application shall be supported by such other evidence as the commissioner may by regulation require.

Notwithstanding § 57-3-302, the state tax on intoxicating liquor or alcoholic beverages with an alcoholic content of seven percent (7%) or less shall be one dollar and ten cents ($1.10) per gallon and no identification stamps shall be required to be fixed to the retail container of such alcoholic beverage.

Acts 1939, ch. 49, § 13; C. Supp. 1950, § 6648.19 (Williams, § 6648.16); Acts 1965, ch. 119, § 1; 1968, ch. 521, § 1; 1970, ch. 361, § 1; 1970, ch. 398, § 1; 1974, ch. 707, § 1; modified; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 57-132; Acts 1980, ch. 885, § 4; 1983, ch. 119, § 1; 1987, ch. 226, § 1; 1988, ch. 526, § 13; 1990, ch. 621, §§ 1, 2; 1992, ch. 608, §§ 1-4; 1993, ch. 108, § 1; 2014, ch. 861, § 5.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 16 Tenn. Juris., Intoxicating Liquors, §§ 16, 17.

Law Reviews.

The Tennessee Department of Revenue and the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act (Mike Norton), 6 Mem. St. U.L. Rev. 303.

57-3-304. Sale or possession of untaxed alcoholic beverages unlawful.

No alcoholic beverages in retail containers shall be sold for eventual retail sale or distribution by gift or retail sale in the state unless the taxes imposed under this part are paid. No retail outlet or unlicensed individual shall purchase or have in its possession any alcoholic beverages unless the taxes imposed under this part are paid.

Any person possessing alcoholic beverages in excess of five gallons (5 gals.) shall have the burden of proof that such beverages were purchased from a licensed retailer or retail food store licensed to sell wine pursuant to part 8 of this chapter and that all taxes imposed by this part have been paid.

It is unlawful for any person, dealer, distributor, or manufacturer, to sell, offer for sale, display for sale, barter, exchange or give away any alcoholic beverage, or any container thereof, in this state, without having first paid, in the manner prescribed by the commission, the tax provided in §§ 57-3-302 and 57-3-303.

A violation of this section is a Class C misdemeanor.

Acts 1939, ch. 49, § 13; C. Supp. 1950, § 6648.19 (Williams, § 6648.16); impl. am. Acts 1963, ch. 257, § 34; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 57-133; Acts 1989, ch. 591, § 113; 1992, ch. 608, § 5; 2009, ch. 434, § 5; 2014, ch. 554, § 3.

Cross-References. Penalty for Class C misdemeanor, §40-35-111.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 16 Tenn. Juris., Intoxicating Liquors, §§ 12, 17, 20.

57-3-305. State tax exclusive.

The tax imposed in §§57-3-302 and57-3-303 is a state tax, for the benefit of the state and the counties thereof as hereinafter provided, and no county, municipality or taxing district shall have the power to levy a like tax.

Acts 1939, ch. 49, § 13; 1943, ch. 5, § 3; 1947, ch. 61, § 3; mod. C. Supp. 1950, § 6648.19 (Williams, § 6648.16); T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 57-134.

57-3-306. Disposition of tax proceeds.

Any county in this state where a distillery is located shall receive four cents (4¢) per liter of the tax imposed by § 57-3-302(b) collected on all sales in this state of the spirits manufactured by such distillery.

Except for the distribution as provided in subsection (a), collections of the tax imposed by § 57-3-302(a) and (b) shall be distributed eighty-two and one-half percent (82.5%) to the general fund and seventeen and one-half percent (17.5%) to the counties. The amount distributed to the counties shall be apportioned among the counties three fourths (¾) in proportion to their population and one fourth (¼) in proportion to their area.

Before distributing to the counties any of the revenues mentioned in subsection (a) and subdivision (b)(1), the commissioner of finance and administration shall deduct a sum measured at a rate of sixteen thousand dollars ($16,000) per month, which sum together with an appropriation per annum from the general fund of the state shall be apportioned and transmitted to the University of Tennessee for use by the university in operating the county technical advisory service (CTAS) in its Institute for Public Service (IPS) as provided by § 49-9-402.

Thirty percent (30%) of the amount distributed to counties having a population of more than two hundred fifty thousand (250,000), according to the 1970 federal census or any subsequent federal census, shall be paid by such counties to any municipalities within such counties that have a population of one hundred fifty thousand (150,000), according to the 1970 federal census or any subsequent federal census.

For purposes of allocating tax proceeds under this section, county population shall be as reported by the most recent federal census except as modified by special census taken pursuant to § 9-16-101.

Acts 1939, ch. 49, § 13; 1943, ch. 5, §§ 1, 3; 1947, ch. 61, §§ 1, 3; mod. C. Supp. 1950, § 6648.19 (Williams, § 6648.16); impl. am. Acts 1959, ch. 9, § 14; Acts 1963, ch. 37, § 2; impl. am. Acts 1963, ch. 257, § 33; Acts 1973, ch. 295, § 18; impl. am. Acts 1975, ch. 248, § 1; Acts 1978, ch. 497, § 3; 1978, ch. 806, § 3; 1978, ch. 835, § 1; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 57-135; Acts 1980, ch. 556, § 1; 1983, ch. 36, § 1; 2003, ch. 355, § 18; 2005, ch. 500, § 1; 2006, ch. 989, § 6.

Compiler's Notes. For tables of U.S. decennial populations of Tennessee counties, see Volume 13 and its supplement.

Acts 2003, ch. 355, § 66 provided that no expenditure of public funds pursuant to the act shall be made in violation of the provisions of Title VI of the Civil Rights Act of 1964, as codified in 42 U.S.C. § 2000d.

Acts 2006, ch. 989, § 17 provided that § 6 of the act, which deleted former subdivision (b)(3), shall apply to funds remitted to the department of revenue on or after August 1, 2006.

Cross-References. Disposition of license fees of wholesalers and retailers, §57-3-206.

Attorney General Opinions. The state can probably continue to distribute state-shared taxes even if the General Assembly does not enact a general appropriations act, OAG 00-083 (5/4/00).

The state can probably continue to distribute state-shared taxes even if the General Assembly does not enact a general appropriations act, OAG 00-083 (5/4/00).

57-3-307. Accounting for distribution of alcoholic beverages — Inventory adjustment for unsalable beverages.

Any wholesaler who shall import alcoholic beverages into this state, or receive alcoholic beverages manufactured in the state for the purpose of use, resale or distribution by gift or retail sale in this state, shall be required to account for the distribution of all such alcoholic beverages and shall be unconditionally liable for the tax imposed herein for each and every container of alcoholic beverage removed from inventory and not sold or otherwise disposed of in accordance with this chapter or by rules and regulations promulgated by the commissioner of revenue.

The commissioner shall prescribe appropriate rules and regulations for the proper adjustment of the wholesaler's inventory when alcoholic beverages in the wholesaler's inventory are rendered unsalable. Before authorizing such an adjustment, a claim in writing and proof must be furnished in support thereof and verified by the department of revenue.

Acts 1951, ch. 138, § 1 (Williams, § 6648.16); Acts 1965, ch. 243, § 1; 1968, ch. 521, § 2; 1970, ch. 398, § 2; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 57-136.

57-3-308. Taxes on high alcohol content beer.

The taxes imposed on high alcohol content beer shall be as provided in §57-3-302(a) or §57-3-303(l ), whichever is applicable.

Acts 2011, ch. 448, § 18.